Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that 6PPD (N-(1,3-dimethylbutyl)-N'-phenyl-p-phenylenediamine) is a chemical commonly used in motor vehicle tires to keep them from cracking and degrading quickly. 6PPD works by moving to the surface of the tire and forming a film that protects the tire. When 6PPD is exposed to oxygen and ozone at the surface of a tire, it forms 6PPD-quinone (2-((4-methylpentan-2-yl)amino)-5-(phenylamino)cyclohexa-2,5-diene-1,4-dione). As tires are used and degrade, they release 6PPD-quinone as tire wear particles that are washed or deposited into streams, rivers, and other water bodies through stormwater runoff, aerial deposition, and other pathways.(2) The legislature further finds that 6PPD-quinone is directly linked to urban runoff mortality syndrome, a condition where coho salmon die prior to spawning. 6PPD-quinone is known to be toxic to aquatic species and is the primary causal toxicant for coho salmon.(3) The legislature recognizes the urgency in reducing and stopping the release of 6PPD-quinone into Washington waterways by incentivizing the development and use of safer alternatives to protect salmon, trout, and other aquatic species. Salmon, trout, and other aquatic species are central to Washington's ecosystems, treaty-reserved tribal rights, cultural heritage, recreational fishing, and the state's economy. Ongoing mortality of salmonids linked to 6PPD-quinone undermines ecological health, fisheries, and community well-being.(4) The legislature further finds that alternatives to 6PPD are under development. Phasing out 6PPD in favor of safer alternatives will incentivize innovation, protect aquatic species, reduce stormwater pollution, align with Washington's leadership in toxics reduction and salmonid recovery, and provide the timing necessary to identify an alternative to 6PPD that ensures motorist safety and protection of human health and the environment.(5) It is therefore the legislature's intent to incentivize the phase out of 6PPD in tires by imposing a temporary fee on the distributors of tires containing 6PPD, restricting 6PPD in tires after providing time for the industry to bring 6PPD alternatives into the marketplace, and restricting 6PPD substitutes that are not safer alternatives to 6PPD in tires.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "6PPD" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.350.010(1).(2) "Department" means the department of ecology.(3) "Regrettable 6PPD substitute" means a chemical or chemicals that are not determined by the department to be a safer alternative consistent with section 3 of this act.(4) "Safer alternative" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.350.010.(5) "Vehicle" has the same meaning as in RCW 46.04.670.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) Beginning January 1, 2035, no person may manufacture, sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in this state a new tire containing intentionally added 6PPD or a regrettable 6PPD substitute identified by rule by the department.(2) In adopting rules to identify regrettable 6PPD substitutes subject to the requirements of this section, the department, in consultation with the department of health, must consider information generated by other states or nations to identify regrettable 6PPD substitutes. The department must, at minimum, identify as a regrettable 6PPD substitute any alternative that it determines is not a safer alternative consistent with the criteria established under chapter 70A.350 RCW.(3) Nothing in this chapter limits the authority of the department with respect to tires, 6PPD, or 6PPD substitutes under chapter 70A.350 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. (1) The department may adopt rules as necessary for implementing, administering, and enforcing this chapter.(2) A person violating a requirement of this chapter, a rule adopted under this chapter, or an order issued under this chapter, is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each violation in the case of a first offense. Repeat violations are subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each repeat offense.(3) The department may issue a corrective action order to a person in violation of the requirements of this chapter.(4) Any penalty provided for in this section, and any order issued by the department under this chapter, may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board.(5) All penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the model toxics control operating account created in RCW 70A.305.180.Sec. 5. RCW 43.21B.110 and 2025 c 327 s 1, 2025 c 319 s 6, 2025 c 316 s 301, 2025 c 314 s 13, 2025 c 311 s 7, and 2025 c 58 s 1008 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) The hearings board shall only have jurisdiction to hear and decide appeals from the following decisions of the department, the director, local conservation districts, the air pollution control boards or authorities as established pursuant to chapter 70A.15 RCW, local health departments, the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, the parks and recreation commission, and authorized public entities described in chapter 79.100 RCW:(a) Civil penalties imposed pursuant to chapter 70A.230 RCW and RCW 18.104.155, 70A.15.3160, 70A.300.090, 70A.20.050, 70A.205.740, 70A.205.280, 70A.205.545, 70A.355.070, 70A.430.070, 70A.500.260, 70A.505.100, 70A.505.110, 70A.530.040, 70A.350.070, 70A.515.060, 70A.245.040, 70A.245.050, 70A.245.070, 70A.245.080, 70A.245.130, 70A.245.140, 70A.65.200, 70A.455.090, 70A.535.180, 70A.550.030, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, 70A.208.230, section 4 of this act, 70A.565.030, 76.04.205, 76.09.170, 77.55.440, 78.44.250, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102.(b) Orders issued pursuant to RCW 18.104.043, 18.104.060, 18.104.130, 43.27A.190, 70A.15.2520, 70A.15.3010, 70A.15.4530, 70A.15.6010, 70A.205.740, 70A.205.280, 70A.214.140, 70A.300.120, 70A.350.070, 70A.245.020, 70A.65.200, 70A.535.180, 70A.505.100, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, 70A.208.230, section 4 of this act, 70A.565.030, 86.16.020, 88.46.070, 90.03.665, 90.14.130, 90.46.250, 90.48.120, 90.48.240, 90.56.330, and 90.64.040.(c) Except as provided in RCW 90.03.210(2), the issuance, modification, or termination of any permit, certificate, or license by the department or any air authority in the exercise of its jurisdiction, including the issuance or termination of a waste disposal permit, the denial of an application for a waste disposal permit, the modification of the conditions or the terms of a waste disposal permit, a decision to approve or deny a solid waste management plan under RCW 70A.205.055, approval or denial of an application for a beneficial use determination under RCW 70A.205.260, an application for a change under RCW 90.03.383, or a permit to distribute reclaimed water under RCW 90.46.220.(d) Decisions of local health departments regarding the granting or denial of solid waste permits pursuant to chapter 70A.205 RCW, including appeals by the department as provided in RCW 70A.205.130.(e) Decisions of local health departments regarding the issuance and enforcement of permits to use or dispose of biosolids under RCW 70A.226.090.(f) Decisions of the department regarding waste-derived fertilizer or micronutrient fertilizer under RCW 15.54.820.(g) Decisions of local conservation districts related to the denial of approval or denial of certification of a dairy nutrient management plan; conditions contained in a plan; application of any dairy nutrient management practices, standards, methods, and technologies to a particular dairy farm; and failure to adhere to the plan review and approval timelines in RCW 90.64.026 as provided in RCW 90.64.028.(h) Any other decision by the department or an air authority which pursuant to law must be decided as an adjudicative proceeding under chapter 34.05 RCW.(i) Decisions of the department of natural resources, the department of fish and wildlife, and the department that are reviewable under chapter 76.09 RCW, and the department of natural resources' appeals of county, city, or town objections under RCW 76.09.050(7).(j) Forest health hazard orders issued by the commissioner of public lands under RCW 76.06.180.(k) Decisions of the department of fish and wildlife to issue, deny, condition, or modify a hydraulic project approval permit under chapter 77.55 RCW, to issue a stop work order, to issue a notice to comply, to issue a civil penalty, or to issue a notice of intent to disapprove applications.(l) Decisions of the department of natural resources that are reviewable under RCW 78.44.270.(m) Decisions of an authorized public entity under RCW 79.100.010 to take temporary possession or custody of a vessel or to contest the amount of reimbursement owed that are reviewable by the hearings board under RCW 79.100.120.(n) Decisions of the department of ecology that are appealable under RCW 70A.245.020 to set recycled minimum postconsumer content for products or to temporarily exclude types of products in plastic containers from minimum postconsumer recycled content requirements.(o) Orders by the department of ecology under RCW 70A.455.080.(p) Decisions by the department of ecology under RCW 70A.208.150(5) regarding a proposal by a producer responsibility organization to count materials sent to an alternative recycling facility towards recycling performance targets.(q) Decisions of the department of natural resources under RCW 76.04.205.(2) The following hearings shall not be conducted by the hearings board:(a) Hearings required by law to be conducted by the shorelines hearings board pursuant to chapter 90.58 RCW, except where appeals to the pollution control hearings board and appeals to the shorelines hearings board have been consolidated pursuant to RCW 43.21B.340.(b) Hearings conducted by the department pursuant to RCW 70A.15.3010, 70A.15.3070, 70A.15.3080, 70A.15.3090, 70A.15.3100, 70A.15.3110, and 90.44.180.(c) Appeals of decisions by the department under RCW 90.03.110 and 90.44.220.(d) Hearings conducted by the department to adopt, modify, or repeal rules.(3) Review of rules and regulations adopted by the hearings board shall be subject to review in accordance with the provisions of the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW.Sec. 6. RCW 43.21B.300 and 2025 c 316 s 302 and 2025 c 58 s 3008 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Any civil penalty provided in RCW 18.104.155, 70A.15.3160, 70A.205.280, 70A.230.080, 70A.300.090, 70A.20.050, 70A.245.040, 70A.245.050, 70A.245.070, 70A.245.080, 70A.245.130, 70A.245.140, 70A.65.200, 70A.430.070, 70A.455.090, 70A.500.260, 70A.505.110, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, 70A.208.230, section 4 of this act, 70A.565.030, 86.16.081, 88.46.090, 90.03.600, 90.46.270, 90.48.144, 90.56.310, 90.56.330, and 90.64.102 and chapter 70A.355 RCW shall be imposed by a notice in writing, either by certified mail with return receipt requested or by personal service, to the person incurring the penalty from the department or the local air authority, describing the violation with reasonable particularity. For penalties issued by local air authorities, within 30 days after the notice is received, the person incurring the penalty may apply in writing to the authority for the remission or mitigation of the penalty. Upon receipt of the application, the authority may remit or mitigate the penalty upon whatever terms the authority in its discretion deems proper. The authority may ascertain the facts regarding all such applications in such reasonable manner and under such rules as it may deem proper and shall remit or mitigate the penalty only upon a demonstration of extraordinary circumstances such as the presence of information or factors not considered in setting the original penalty.(2) Any penalty imposed under this section may be appealed to the pollution control hearings board in accordance with this chapter if the appeal is filed with the hearings board and served on the department or authority 30 days after the date of receipt by the person penalized of the notice imposing the penalty or 30 days after the date of receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority of the application for relief from penalty.(3) A penalty shall become due and payable on the later of:(a) 30 days after receipt of the notice imposing the penalty;(b) 30 days after receipt of the notice of disposition by a local air authority on application for relief from penalty, if such an application is made; or(c) 30 days after receipt of the notice of decision of the hearings board if the penalty is appealed.(4) If the amount of any penalty is not paid to the department within 30 days after it becomes due and payable, the attorney general, upon request of the department, shall bring an action in the name of the state of Washington in the superior court of Thurston county, or of any county in which the violator does business, to recover the penalty. If the amount of the penalty is not paid to the authority within 30 days after it becomes due and payable, the authority may bring an action to recover the penalty in the superior court of the county of the authority's main office or of any county in which the violator does business. In these actions, the procedures and rules of evidence shall be the same as in an ordinary civil action.(5) All penalties recovered shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the general fund except the following:(a) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 18.104.155 must be credited to the reclamation account as provided in RCW 18.104.155(7);(b) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.15.3160 must be disposed of pursuant to RCW 70A.15.3160;(c) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.230.080, 70A.300.090, 70A.430.070, 70A.555.110, 70A.560.020, and 70A.565.030 must be credited to the model toxics control operating account created in RCW 70A.305.180;(d) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.245.040, 70A.245.050, and chapter 70A.208 RCW must be credited to the recycling enhancement account created in RCW 70A.245.100;(e) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.500.260 must be deposited into the electronic products recycling account created in RCW 70A.500.130;(f) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.65.200 must be credited to the climate investment account created in RCW 70A.65.250;(g) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 90.56.330 must be credited to the coastal protection fund established in RCW 90.48.390; and(h) Penalties imposed pursuant to RCW 70A.355.070 must be credited to the underground storage tank account created in RCW 70A.355.090.Sec. 7. RCW 70A.205.405 and 2025 c 417 s 301 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There is levied a $5 per tire fee on the retail sale of new replacement vehicle tires. The fee imposed in this subsection must be paid by the buyer to the seller, and each seller shall collect from the buyer the full amount of the fee. The fee collected from the buyer by the seller less the ten percent amount retained by the seller as provided in RCW 70A.205.430(1) must be paid to the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045.(2) The department of revenue shall incorporate into the agency's regular audit cycle a reconciliation of the number of tires sold and the amount of revenue collected by the businesses selling new replacement vehicle tires at retail. The department of revenue shall collect on the business excise tax return from the businesses selling new replacement vehicle tires at retail:(a) The number of tires sold; and(b) The fee levied in this section.(3) All other applicable provisions of chapter 82.32 RCW have full force and application with respect to the fee imposed under this section. The department of revenue shall administer this section.(4)(a) In addition to the fee specified in subsection (1) of this section, beginning January 1, 2027, there is levied:(i) A $3 per tire 6PPD mitigation fee on the retail sale of new replacement 6PPD-containing tires with a load rating of up to 2,500 pounds;(ii) A $6 per tire 6PPD mitigation fee on the retail sale of new replacement 6PPD-containing tires with a load rating of 2,500 pounds or greater.(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, and each January 1st thereafter, the amount of the fees specified in (a) of this subsection shall increase by 10 percent relative to the amount of the fee during the previous calendar year.(c) The fee imposed in this subsection (4) is levied on the seller of the tire and must be paid to the department of revenue in accordance with RCW 82.32.045. The seller may not collect the 6PPD mitigation fee from the buyer, charge the 6PPD mitigation fee as a separate line item at the point of sale, or display the 6PPD mitigation fee on a receipt provided to a customer.(d) To implement the mitigation fee on 6PPD-containing tires under this subsection, the department of revenue may determine that a tire contains intentionally added 6PPD if it has not been certified as a 6PPD-free tire under subsection (5) of this section, or if testing performed at the direction of the department of a certified tire indicates that the tire contains 6PPD.(e) The 6PPD mitigation fee imposed under this subsection does not apply to:(i) 6PPD-free tires;(ii) Original equipment tires manufactured, imported, sold, or distributed into or in Washington as a component of a new motor vehicle;(iii) Retreaded tires; or(iv) Tires provided free under a warranty or under a federally mandated or voluntary manufacturer recall.(f) Fees collected under this section must be deposited in the 6PPD mitigation account established in section 8 of this act.(5)(a) Prior to the effective date of any pertinent restrictions on 6PPD in tires under chapter 70A.350 RCW, the department of revenue may determine that a tire that is certified as a 6PPD-free tire consistent with this subsection (5) is exempt from the 6PPD mitigation fee imposed in subsection (4) of this section.(b) A person may certify that a tire is a 6PPD-free tire by submitting a certificate, under penalty of perjury, using a form prescribed by the department, certifying that the tire is a 6PPD-free tire, based on tire manufacturer testing or supply chain documentation.(c) A person must maintain records sufficient to support their declaration and make such records available to the department for inspection or audit upon request.(d) The department may:(i) Conduct periodic testing of tires that are certified as 6PPD-free tires under this subsection; and(ii) Require recertification.(e) The department may impose interest and penalties on 6PPD mitigation fee amounts owed as provided in chapter 82.32 RCW.(f) The department shall maintain and publish on its website a list of certified 6PPD-free tires that are exempt from the 6PPD mitigation fee levied under subsection (4) of this section.(6) For the purposes of this section((, "new)):(a) "New replacement vehicle tires" means tires that are newly manufactured for vehicle purposes and does not include retreaded vehicle tires;(b) "6PPD" has the same meaning as in RCW 70A.350.010;(c) "6PPD-containing tire" means a tire that contains intentionally added 6PPD; and(d) "6PPD-free tire" means a tire that does not contain intentionally added 6PPD.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 70A.205 RCW to read as follows:(1) The 6PPD mitigation account shall be created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from 6PPD mitigation fees collected under RCW 70A.205.405(4) must be deposited into the account. Only the director of the department or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to the allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.(2) Money in the 6PPD mitigation account may be used for:(a) The administrative costs of the department of revenue incurred in implementing, administering, and enforcing requirements related to the 6PPD mitigation fee in RCW 70A.205.405;(b) The costs of the department of ecology under chapter 70A.350 RCW related to 6PPD and regrettable 6PPD substitutes and to implement the restrictions in chapter 70A.--- RCW (the new chapter created in section 12 of this act);(c) Monitoring and sampling activities related to 6PPD-quinone contamination in stormwater throughout Washington state;(d) Surveying salmonid spawning waterbodies for prespawn mortality related to 6PPD-quinone contamination in stormwater throughout Washington state;(e) Other activities related to assessing the impacts of 6PPD-quinone on salmonid and other aquatic species; and(f) The purposes specified in RCW 70A.205.420(1), which for purposes of funds in the account created in this section must include management of illegally dumped tires in urban areas or in communities with close proximity to fish bearing streams.Sec. 9. RCW 70A.205.425 and 2025 c 417 s 302 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The first $600,000 of the net receipts from the tire fees imposed under RCW 70A.205.405(1) received each fiscal year must be deposited in the waste tire removal account created under RCW 70A.205.415. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used for the cleanup of unauthorized waste tire piles and measures that prevent future accumulation of unauthorized waste tire piles.(2) The receipts remaining from the tire fees imposed under RCW 70A.205.405(1) after the deposit in subsection (1) of this section must be deposited in the motor vehicle fund created in RCW 46.68.070 for the purpose of road wear related maintenance on state and local public highways.Sec. 10. RCW 70A.205.410 and 2005 c 354 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The fee required by ((this chapter))RCW 70A.205.405(1), to be collected by the seller, shall be deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to the department of revenue, and any seller who appropriates or converts the fee collected to his or her own use or to any use other than the payment of the fee to the extent that the money required to be collected is not available for payment on the due date as prescribed in this chapter is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.(2) In case any seller fails to collect the fee imposed in ((this chapter))RCW 70A.205.405(1) or, having collected the fee, fails to pay it or the 6PPD mitigation fee in RCW 70A.205.405(4) to the department of revenue in the manner prescribed by this chapter, whether such failure is the result of his or her own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond his or her control, he or she shall, nevertheless, be personally liable to the state for the amount of the fee.(3) The amount of the fee imposed in RCW 70A.205.405(1), until paid by the buyer to the seller or to the department of revenue, shall constitute a debt from the buyer to the seller and any seller who fails or refuses to collect the fee as required with intent to violate the provisions of this chapter or to gain some advantage or benefit, either direct or indirect, and any buyer who refuses to pay any fee due under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.Sec. 11. RCW 70A.205.430 and 2025 c 417 s 303 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Every person engaged in making retail sales of new replacement vehicle tires in this state shall retain 25 cents for each tire subject to the fee imposed under RCW 70A.205.405(1). The moneys retained may be used for costs associated with the proper management of the waste vehicle tires by the retailer.(2) The department of ecology will administer the funds for the purposes specified in RCW 70A.205.010(6) including, but not limited to:(a) Making grants to local governments for pilot demonstration projects for on-site shredding and recycling of tires from unauthorized dump sites;(b) Grants to local government for enforcement programs;(c) Implementation of a public information and education program to include posters, signs, and informational materials to be distributed to retail tire sales and tire service outlets;(d) Product marketing studies for recycled tires and alternatives to land disposal.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. Sections 2 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 70A RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---